Tennessee, session 114, HB0722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-132, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The commission shall purge the permanent registration records of those persons
whose registrations are required to be purged under § 2-2-106, unless otherwise
prohibited by federal law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0722
000804
- 1 -